Utah statutes.
78B-14-202.   Duration of personal jurisdiction.

Personal jurisdiction acquired by a tribunal of this state in a proceeding under this chapter or other law of this state relating to a support order continues as long as a tribunal of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its order or continuing jurisdiction to enforce its order as provided by Sections 78B-14-205, 78B-14-206, and 78B-14-211.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

